District of Columbia statutes.
33-111.06

Repealed

Applicability of act to foreign and interstate commerce.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 1106, 44 DCR 777
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(x), 58 DCR 1720
1981 Ed., § 41-161.6.